fi: kanakokolihatuote
sv: kycklinghelköttsprodukt

fi: kinkkuvalmiste, kinkkuleike
sv: skinkprodukt

fr: viande hachée
de: Hackfleisch
es: carne picada
it: carne macinata

en: meatball, meatballs
ar: كرات اللحم
az: tefteli
be: тэфтэлі
bg: кюфте, кюфтета
ca: mandonguilla
cs: masové koule
de: fleischklößchen, Frikadelle
el: κεφτές
eo: viandobulo
es: albóndiga
eu: haragi-bola
fa: کله‌گنجشکی
fi: lihapulla, lihapullat, lihapyörykkä, lihapyörykät
fr: boulette de viande
gl: albóndega
gn: so'o josopy
hr: jetrene okruglice
id: bola daging
it: polpetta
ja: ミートボール
kk: тефтели
ko: 고기완자
nl: gehaktbal
pt: almôndega
ro: pârjoală
ru: тефтели
sv: köttbulle, köttbullar
tl: almondigas
uk: тефтелі
vi: thịt viên
zh: 肉丸

en: chicken meatball
bg: пилешко кюфте, пилешки кюфтета
es: albóndigas de pollo
fi: broileripyörykkä, broileripyörykät
fr: boulettes de poulet
hr: pileća polpeta
it: polpette di pollo

en: beef meatball
de: Rinderfleischbällchen
es: albóndiga de carne de res
fr: boulette de viande de boeuf
hr: goveđe okruglice
it: polpette di manzo

en: offal
de: Innereien
es: visceras
fr: abats
hr: iznutrice
it: frattaglie
pl: podroby

en: quenelle, quenelles
xx: quenelle, quenelles
he: קאנל
hy: Կնել
io: Kenelo
ja: クネル
ko: 크넬
ru: Кнели
uk: Кнелі
zh: 肉丸子

en: camel
fr: chameau
nl: kameel

en: camel meat
fr: viande de chameau
it: carne di cammello
nl: kameelvlees

en: beef, steers
bg: говедо, говеждо
ca: carn de vaca
cs: Hovězí
da: oksekød
de: Rind, Rinderfleisch
el: Μοσχάρι
et: Veiseliha
fi: nauta, naudan, härkä, härän
fr: bœuf, boeuf, Boeufs
hr: goveđa, goveđi, govedi, govedina
hu: marha
it: manzo
ja: ビーフ
nb: storfekjøtt
pl: Wołowina, wołowe, wołowa, wołowy
pt: Carne bovina
ro: vită
ru: Говядина
sv: nötkött
zh: 牛

en: Grilled lean beef rib steak
fr: Entrecôte de boeuf partie maigre grillée
hr: odrezak nemasnih goveđih rebara na žaru
it: costata di manzo magra alla griglia

en: Pan-fried lean beef rib steak
fr: Entrecôte de boeuf partie maigre poêlée
hr: odrezak nemasnih goveđih rebara u tavi

en: Braised beef short ribs
fr: côtes de boeuf braisées
hr: pirjana govedina kratka rebra
it: costine di manzo brasate

en: grass-fed beef
ca: res alimentat amb herba
de: Weidefleisch
es: carne de res alimentada con pasto
fr: bœuf nourri à l'herbe
hr: govedina hranjena travom
it: manzo alimentato con erba
nl: grasgevoerd rundvlees
pt: carne de vaca alimentada com capim

fr: pur boeuf
bg: чисто говеждо
ca: res pura
de: reines Rindfleisch
es: res puro
it: manzo puro
nl: puur rundvlees

en: beef extract
bg: екстракт от говеждо
ca: extracte de res, extracte de bou
de: Rindfleischextrakt
es: extracto de res
fi: naudanlihauute, häränlihauute
fr: extrait de bœuf, extrait de boeuf
hu: marhahúskivont
it: estratto di manzo
ja: ビーフエキス
nl: rundvleesextrakt

en: roasted beef including beef juices
de: gebratenes Rindfleisch einschließlich Rindfleischsäften
hr: pečena govedina uključujući goveđe sokove
it: manzo arrosto con succhi di manzo

en: beef meat, pure beef meat
bg: говеждо месо
ca: carn pura de vaca, carn de boví
de: Rindfleisch
es: carne de vaca, carne de vacuno, carne bovina, Carne pura de vaca
fi: naudanliha, naudanlihaa
fr: viande de bœuf, viande de boeuf, viande bovine, pure viande bovine, pure viande de boeuf, viande de bovin
hr: goveđe meso, govede meso
hu: marhahús
it: carne di manzo, carne bovina, carne di bovino
ja: 牛肉, ぎゅうにく, ぎゅう肉, 牛にく
lv: Govju gaļa
nb: kjøtt av storfe
nl: Rundvlees
no: Oksekjøtt
pl: Mięso wołowe
ro: carne de vită, carne de vita
sl: Goveje meso
tr: Sığır eti
zh: 牛肉

en: mechanically separated meat of beef
fr: viande de bœuf séparée mécaniquement, viande séparée mécaniquement de bœuf
hr: mehanički otkošeno goveđe meso
it: carne di manzo separata meccanicamente